apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="soa/mes__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásada</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadak</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagá</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagi</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadaga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadakga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagága</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagiga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadage</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadak</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadakge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagáge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagák</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagige</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagik</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadakgen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagágen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásadagigen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijn</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijnga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijnge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijngen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásis</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásisga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásisge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásisgen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásij</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijgen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásin</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásinga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásinge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásingen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mes</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mesga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mesge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mesgen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmása</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásaga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásage</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásak</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásagen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásav</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásavga</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásavge</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásavgen</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijda</l>
          <r>mes<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bmásijdak</l>

    <e lm="soames"><i>soa</i><par n="soa/mes__Pron_Indef"/></e>
